pt-BR: Ingrediente base: Cevada; Trigo-sarraceno; Mandioca ou tapioca; Milho; Fruta (uvas; Grãos mistos; Batata; Arroz; Cana-de-açúcar; Batata-doce; Trigo; etc.); Outros
nb: Basisingrediens: Bygg; Bokhvete; Kassava eller tapioka; Mais; Frukt (druer; Kornblanding; Potet; Ris; Sukkerrør; Søtpotet; Hvete; osv.); Annet
el: Βασικό συστατικό: Κριθάρι; Φαγόπυρο; Κασάβα ή ταπιόκα; Καλαμπόκι; Φρούτα (σταφύλια; Ανάμεικτα δημητριακά; Πατάτα; Ρύζι; Ζαχαροκάλαμο; Γλυκοπατάτα; Σιτάρι; κ.λπ.); Άλλο
sl-SI: Osnovna sestavina: Ječmen; Ajda; Kasava ali tapioka; Koruza; Sadje (grozdje; Mešana žita; Krompir; Riž; Sladkorni trs; Sladki krompir; Pšenica; itd.); Drugo
hu: Alapösszetevő: Árpa; Hajdina; Manióka vagy tápióka; Kukorica; Gyümölcs (szőlő; Vegyes gabona; Burgonya; Rizs; Cukornád; Édesburgonya; Búza; stb.); Egyéb
ja: 土台原料: 大麦; そば; キャッサバまたはタピオカ; トウモロコシ; フルーツ (ブドウ; 雑穀; ジャガイモ; 米; サトウキビ; サツマイモ; 小麦; など); その他
en: Base ingredient: Barley; Buckwheat; Cassava or tapioca; Corn; Fruit (grapes; Mixed grains; Potato; Rice; Sugarcane; Sweet potato; Wheat; etc.); Other
fr: Ingrédient de base: Orge; Sarrasin; Manioc ou tapioca; Maïs; Fruits (raisins; Céréales mixtes; Pomme de terre; Riz; Canne à sucre; Patate douce; Blé; etc.); Autre
nl: Hoofd ingrediënt: Gerst; Boekweit; Cassave of tapioca; Maïs; Fruit (druiven; Gemengde granen; Aardappel; Rijst; Suikerriet; Zoete aardappel; Tarwe; enz.); Overig
da: Grundingrediens: Byg; Boghvede; Maniok eller tapioka; Majs; Frugt (vindruer; Blandede kornsorter; Kartoffel; Ris; Sukkerrør; Sød kartoffel; Hvede; osv.); Andet
ru: Основной ингредиент: Ячмень; Гречиха; Кассава или тапиока; Кукуруза; Фрукты (виноград; Смесь злаков; Картофель; Рис; Сахарный тростник; Батат; Пшеница; и т. д.); Другое
vi: Thành phần cơ bản: Lúa mạch; Kiều mạch; Sắn hoặc bột sắn; Ngô; Trái cây (nho; Ngũ cốc hỗn hợp; Khoai tây; Gạo; Mía; Khoai lang; Lúa mì; v.v.); Khác
sv: Basingrediens: Korn; Bovete; Kassava eller tapioka; Majs; Frukt (druvor; Blandade sädesslag; Potatis; Ris; Sockerrör; Sötpotatis; Vete; osv.); Övrigt
bg-BG: Съставка на основата: Ечемик; Елда; Маниока или тапиока; Царевица; Плодове (грозде; Смесени зърна; Картоф; Ориз; Захарна тръстика; Сладък картоф; Пшеница; и др.); Друго
ro-RO: Ingredient bază: Orz; Hrișcă; Manioacă sau tapioca; Porumb; Fructe (struguri; Cereale mixte; Cartofi; Orez; Trestie de zahăr; Cartof dulce; Grâu; etc.); Altele
es: Ingrediente base: Cebada; Trigo sarraceno; Yuca o tapioca; Maíz; Fruta (uvas; Mezcla de granos; Papa; Arroz; Caña de azúcar; Batata; Trigo; etc.); Otro
pl: Składnik bazowy: Jęczmień; Gryka; Maniok lub tapioka; Kukurydza; Owoce (winogrona; Mieszanka zbóż; Ziemniak; Ryż; Trzcina cukrowa; Batat; Pszenica; itp.); Inne
it: Ingrediente base: Orzo; Grano saraceno; Manioca o tapioca; Mais; Frutta (uva; Cereali misti; Patate; Riso; Canna da zucchero; Patate dolci; Grano; ecc.); Altro
sk-SK: Základná zložka: Jačmeň; Pohánka; Maniok alebo tapioka; Kukurica; Ovocie (hrozno; Zmiešané obilniny; Zemiaky; Ryža; Cukrová trstina; Bataty; Pšenica; atď.); Iné
tr: Ana bileşen: Arpa; Karabuğday; Manyok veya tapyoka; Mısır; Meyve (üzüm; Karışık tahıl; Patates; Pirinç; Şeker kamışı; Tatlı patates; Buğday; vb.); Diğer
cs: Základní složka: Ječmen; Pohanka; Maniok nebo tapioka; Kukuřice; Ovoce (hrozny; Směs obilovin; Brambory; Rýže; Cukrová třtina; Batáty; Pšenice; atd.); Jiné
de: Grundzutat: Gerste; Buchweizen; Maniok oder Tapioka; Mais; Frucht (Trauben; Mischgetreide; Kartoffel; Reis; Zuckerrohr; Süßkartoffel; Weizen; usw.); Sonstige
th: วัตถุดิบพื้นฐาน: ข้าวบาร์เลย์; บัควีต; มันสำปะหลัง; ข้าวโพด; ผลไม้ (องุ่น; ธัญพืชผสม; มันฝรั่ง; ข้าว; อ้อย; มันเทศ; ข้าวสาลี; ฯลฯ); อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Pagrindinė sudedamoji dalis: Miežiai; Grikiai; Manijokai arba tapijoka; Kukurūzai; Vaisiai (vynuogės; Skirtingi grūdai; Bulvės; Ryžiai; Cukranendrės; Saldžiosios bulvės; Kviečiai; ir pan.); Kita
hr-HR: Osnovni sastojak: Ječam; Heljda; Kasava ili tapioka; Kukuruz; Voće (grožđe; Miješane žitarice; Krumpir; Riža; Šećerna trska; Batat; Pšenica; itd.); Ostalo
fi: Pääraaka-aine: Ohra; Tattari; Maniokki tai tapioka; Maissi; Hedelmä (rypäleet; Sekavilja; Peruna; Riisi; Sokeriruoko; Bataatti; Vehnä; jne.); Muu
zh-TW: 基礎原料: 大麥; 蕎麥; 木薯或木薯粉; 玉米; 水果 (葡萄; 雜糧; 馬鈴薯; 米; 甘蔗; 地瓜; 小麥; 等); 其他
ko: 주 원료: 보리; 메밀; 카사바 또는 타피오카; 옥수수; 과일(포도; 혼합 곡물; 감자; 쌀; 사탕수수; 고구마; 밀; 등); 기타
pt-PT: Ingrediente base: Cevada; Trigo-sarraceno; Mandioca ou tapioca; Milho; Fruta (uvas; Grãos mistos; Batata; Arroz; Cana-de-açúcar; Batata-doce; Trigo; etc.); Outro
zh-CN: 基础原料: 大麦; 荞麦; 木薯或木薯粉; 玉米; 水果（葡萄; 杂粮; 土豆; 大米; 甘蔗; 红薯; 小麦; 等）; 其他